Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.060

Refusal of declaration where judgment would not terminate controversy.

The court may refuse to render or enter a declaratory judgment or decree where such judgment or decree, if rendered or entered, would not terminate the uncertainty or controversy giving rise to the proceeding.

[ 1935 c 113 s 6; RRS s 784-6.]